Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 3. Financial Institutions; Loans; Credit.

Sec. 21.36.317.
Licensing of persons in a financial institution.

A financial institution may not allow a person to transact insurance in an office of the institution or on behalf of the institution, unless the person is licensed as required under AS 21.27.

History.

(§ 67 ch 81 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.164

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.36.319.
Anticoercion and antitying.

A person may not

require, as a condition to the lending of money or extension of credit, or a renewal of the loan or extension of credit, that the obligee of the money or credit negotiate a policy or contract of insurance through any particular person or group of persons;

disapprove the insurance policy provided by a borrower for the protection of property securing credit or a loan if disapproval is based on other than reasonable standards uniformly applied and relating to the extent of coverage required and the financial soundness and the services of the insurer; the standards may not discriminate against a particular type of insurer or call for the disapproval of a policy containing coverage in addition to that required;

unless charges are required when the person handling the insurance transaction is a licensee, require a consumer, insurer, broker, or agent to pay a separate charge for handling an insurance policy required as security for a loan on real property, or to pay a separate charge to substitute the insurance policy of one insurer for that of another, except that interest may be charged on premium loans or premium advancements in accordance with the security instrument.

A person shall

use separate documents for an insurance transaction, other than credit insurance or flood insurance, and for a credit transaction; and

maintain separate and distinct records relating to insurance transactions, including consumer complaint information, and make the records available to the director for inspection upon notice.

A person may not include insurance premiums in a primary credit transaction without the consent of the consumer.

Nothing in this section prohibits a person from informing a consumer or prospective consumer that insurance is required in order to obtain a loan or credit, that loan or credit approval is contingent on the procurement of acceptable insurance by the consumer, or that insurance is available from the person.

History.

(§ 8 ch 163 SLA 1976; am §§ 68, 69 ch 81 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.165

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.36.320.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.910.]

Sec. 21.36.321.
Misrepresentation in financial institution sales.

In the sale of insurance by a financial institution, a person may not engage in any practice or use an advertisement that may tend to mislead or deceive a consumer or cause a consumer to erroneously believe that

the insurance is backed by or a return on the insurance is guaranteed by the state, the federal government, the person, or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

the state or federal government

will pay a claim under an insurance contract that is an obligation of or was sold by the person;

is responsible for the insurance sales activities of the person; or

guarantees the credit of the person;

for insurance that contains investment risk, the insurance does not contain investment risk, the principal may not be lost, or the value of the insurance may not decline;

the lending of money, extension of credit, or a renewal of a loan is conditioned on the purchase of insurance from the person and that insurance may not be purchased from another source.

History.

(§ 70 ch 81 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.167

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.36.323.
Disclosures required in financial institution sales.

In the sale of insurance by a financial institution, a person shall disclose both orally and in writing to a consumer before the initial purchase of insurance that

the insurance is not a deposit or other obligation of the person;

the insurance is not guaranteed by the person or the person soliciting insurance;

the insurance is not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or other agency of the United States, the financial institution, or the person;

if the insurance contains risk, the insurance contains investment risk and the insurance may lose value;

the consumer is not required to negotiate a policy or contract of insurance through any particular person or group of persons as a condition to the lending of money or extension of credit, or a renewal of the loan or extension of credit, except that the person may impose reasonable requirements uniformly applied and relating to the extent of coverage required and the financial soundness and the services of the insurer and that the standards may not discriminate against a particular type of insurer or require disapproval of a policy containing coverage in addition to that required.

A person shall also provide the disclosures required in (a) of this section to a consumer both orally and in writing at the time of application for an extension of credit.

If an application for insurance is made by telephone, written disclosure as required in (a) of this section must be mailed to the consumer within three working days.

A person may provide the disclosures required in (a) of this section electronically, if

the consumer affirmatively consents to electronic disclosure; and

the disclosures are provided in a format that the consumer is able to access at a later time by a method such as through printing or storing the disclosures electronically.

A person shall provide the disclosures required in (a) of this section in a meaningful form and in a conspicuous, simple, direct, and understandable manner that is designed to call attention to the information provided.

A person shall obtain a written acknowledgment or, in the case of an electronic disclosure provided in compliance with (d) of this section, a written or electronic acknowledgment, by the consumer that the consumer received the disclosures as required in this section.

This section does not require that a person provide the disclosures required in this section in advertisements that are of a general nature or that describe or list the services or products offered by a financial institution or on behalf of a financial institution.

In this section, “meaningful form” means

for other than an electronic form, a form of disclosure that is provided to a consumer orally and in writing;

for an electronic form, a disclosure that a consumer cannot electronically bypass before purchasing insurance.

History.

(§ 70 ch 81 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.168

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.36.325.
Definitions for AS 21.36.317 — 21.36.325.

In AS

21.36.317

—

21.36.325

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“consumer” means a person who obtains, applies to obtain, or is solicited to obtain insurance from or on behalf of a financial institution;

“financial institution” means a bank holding company under 12 U.S.C. 1841 (Bank Holding Company Act of 1956); a credit union under 12 U.S.C. 1752 (Federal Credit Union Act); a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or trust company, or any depository institution under 12 U.S.C. 1813(c)(1); and any other person authorized to take federally insured deposits and make loans in the state; “financial institution” includes any employee or agent of a financial institution and any nondepository affiliate or subsidiary of a financial institution but only in the instances when the nondepository affiliate or subsidiary is soliciting the sale or purchase of insurance recommended or sponsored by, on the premises of, or in connection with a product offering of the financial institution; “financial institution” does not include an insurer.

History.

(§ 70 ch 81 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.169

.
Renumbered in 2010, at which time “AS

21.36.317

—

21.36.325

” was substituted for “AS

21.36.164

—

21.36.169

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of those sections.

Sec. 21.36.330.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.920.]

Sec. 21.36.340.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.930.]

Sec. 21.36.350.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.125(c).]